Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.072

[Art. 9] Imposition of restraint.

(1) Arrest is the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing the person to remain within certain specified limits. Confinement is the physical restraint of a person.

(2) An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through other persons subject to this code or through any person authorized by this code to apprehend persons. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of the officer's command or subject to the officer's authority into arrest or confinement.

(3) A commissioned officer or a warrant officer may be ordered apprehended or into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority the officer is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order such persons apprehended or into arrest or confinement may not be delegated.

(4) No person may be ordered apprehended or into arrest or confinement except for probable cause.

(5) This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

[ 1989 c 48 s 9; 1963 c 220 s 9.]